District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-1219.02

Establishment of the Corporation; purposes; fiscal year.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 11, 1998, D.C. Law 12-144, § 3, 45 DCR 3747
Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 103(a), 55 DCR 1689

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2295.2.

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) additions of sections, see §§ 2 to 8 of the Redevelopment Land Agency-RLA Revitalization Corporation Transfer Temporary Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-66, Feb. 27, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 2276).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) establishment of the RLA Revitalization Corporation, see §§ 2 to 8 of Redevelopment Land Agency-RLA Revitalization Corporation Transfer Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-158, November 2, 2001, 48 DCR 10384).
For temporary (90 day) establishment of the RLA Revitalization Corporation, see §§ 2 to 8 of Redevelopment Land Agency-RLA Revitalization Corporation Transfer Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-259, January 30, 2002, 49 DCR 1424).

Editor's Notes

Restriction on Use of Funds: Section 166 of Pub. L. 105-277, the Omnibus Consolidated and Emergency Supplemental Appropriations Act, 1999, provided that no funds made available pursuant to any provision of this Act or any other Act now or hereafter enacted shall be used to capitalize the National Capital Revitalization Corporation or for the purpose of implementing the National Capital Revitalization Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-355) until at least 30 days after the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Authority submits to the appropriate committees of Congress an economic development strategy.